DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-303
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
DIARQ-01
DTC C 1340/ 47 Center Differential Lock Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
. . . o « Center differential lock system

C1240/47 Open or shortcircuitin center differential lock circuit. . ) o

« Center differential lock circuit
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DI-304 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthe center differential is free and center diff. lock switch is OFF.

NG> Repair the center differential lock system.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)



DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-305
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2 [Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-185.

NO> END

YES

3 | Check that bulb for center diff. lock indicator light is not burnt out.

@

4 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between battery and center diff.
lock indicator light, center diff. lock indicator light and skid control ECU (See
page IN-38).

@

5 | Check voltage between terminal EXI of skid control ECU and body ground.

NG> Replace indicator light.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

ON PREPARATION:
@ EXI Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
(@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal EXI of skid control
ECU and body ground when transfer in L4 position.
OK:
Voltage: 10 -14V

N B F17614
NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

RM616EonpageTR -53).

6 Check center diff. lock indicator switch (Full

-time4WD type: See Pub. No.

OK
~_—

e )

Replace center diff. lock indicator switch.

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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